Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 5
INITIATION OF PROCEEDINGS

19-2.5-501. Summons - issuance - contents - service - legislative declaration.

After a petition has been filed, the court shall promptly issue a summons reciting briefly the substance of the petition. The summons must also state, in a separate box, in bold, and in capitalized letters, the following text, inserting the telephone
number and address of the local office of the state public defender and the internet website address of the state public defender, as indicated:

A summons must not issue to any juvenile or respondent who appears voluntarily, or waives service, or has promised in writing to appear at the hearing, but any such person must be provided with a copy of the petition and summons upon appearance or request.

The court may, when the court determines that it is in the best interests of the juvenile, join the juvenile's parent or guardian and the person with whom the juvenile resides, if other than the juvenile's parent or guardian, as a respondent to the action
and shall issue a summons requiring the parent or guardian and the person with whom the juvenile resides, if other than the juvenile's parent or guardian, to appear with the juvenile at all proceedings pursuant to this
article 2.5 that involve the juvenile. If the juvenile's parent or guardian cannot be found, the court, in its discretion, may proceed with the case without the presence of the parent or guardian. For the purposes of this
section and section 19-2.5-611, "parent" is defined in section 19-1-103. This subsection (3) does not apply to any person whose parental rights have been terminated pursuant to the provisions of this title 19 or the parent
of an emancipated minor. For the purposes of this section, "emancipated minor" has the same meaning as set forth in section 13-21-107.5.

The general assembly declares that every parent or guardian whose juvenile is the subject of a juvenile proceeding pursuant to this article 2.5 shall attend any such proceeding.

A parent or legal guardian of a juvenile who is the subject of a juvenile proceeding shall complete the relative information form described in section 19-2.5-1404 (1)(b)(VIII) no later than seven business days after the hearing or prior to the juvenile's
next hearing, whichever occurs first.

The summons must require the person or persons having the physical custody of the juvenile, if other than a parent or guardian, to appear and to bring the juvenile before the court at a time and place stated not more than thirty-five days after issuance
of the summons.

The court on its own motion or on the motion of any party may join as a respondent or require the appearance of any person it deems necessary to the action and authorize the issuance of a summons directed to such person. Any party to the action may request
the issuance of compulsory process by the court requiring the attendance of witnesses on the party's own behalf or on the juvenile's behalf.

If it appears that the welfare of the juvenile or of the public requires that the juvenile be taken into custody, the court may, by endorsement upon the summons, direct that the person serving the summons take the juvenile into custody at once.

The court may authorize the payment of necessary travel expenses incurred by persons summoned or otherwise required to appear. The payments must not exceed the amount allowed to witnesses for travel by the district court.

A summons issued pursuant to this section may be served in the same manner as the summons in a civil action or by mailing the summons to the juvenile's last-known address by certified mail with return receipt requested not less than seven days prior to
the time the juvenile is requested to appear in court. Service by mail is complete upon return of the receipt signed by the juvenile, the juvenile's parents, guardian, legal custodian, physical custodian, or spousal equivalent
as defined in section 19-1-103.

Service upon the parent, guardian, legal custodian, or physical custodian who has physical care of a juvenile of a summons that contains wording commanding the parent, guardian, legal custodian, or physical custodian to produce the juvenile in court constitutes
valid service compelling the attendance of both the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or physical custodian in court. In addition, service of a summons as described in this subsection (8)(b)
compels the juvenile's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or physical custodian either to make all necessary arrangements to ensure that the juvenile is available to appear before the court or to appear in court and show
good cause for the juvenile's failure to appear.

If the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian required to be summoned pursuant to subsection (4) of this section cannot be found within the state, the fact of the juvenile's presence in the state confers jurisdiction on the court as to
any absent parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

When the residence of the person to be served outside the state is known, a copy of the summons and petition must be sent by certified mail with postage prepaid to such person at the person's place of residence with a return receipt requested. Service
of summons is deemed complete seven days after return of the requested receipt.

Repealed.

1. YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO HAVE YOUR OWN LAWYER HELP YOU AT YOUR HEARING. 2. YOU MAY BE ELIGIBLE FOR THIS LAWYER AT NO CHARGE. 3. TO FIND OUT IF YOU ARE ELIGIBLE, YOU OR YOUR PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN SHOULD CALL THE OFFICE OF
THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER AT __________, VISIT THE OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER AT __________, OR VISIT THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER'S WEBSITE AT __________. 4. YOU ARE MORE LIKELY TO HAVE A FREE LAWYER PRESENT AT YOUR HEARING
IF YOU OR YOUR PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN CALLS OR VISITS THE OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER AT LEAST FIVE DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE YOUR HEARING.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 594, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(11) repealed, (SB 22-018), ch. 191, p. 1274, § 7, effective July 15.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-514 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-502. Petition initiation - petition form and content.

If the district attorney determines that the interests of the juvenile or of the community require that further action be taken, the district attorney may file a petition in delinquency on the form specified in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section,
which the court shall accept. If the district attorney chooses to file a petition in delinquency on any juvenile who receives a detention hearing pursuant to section 19-2.5-305, the district attorney shall file the petition within
seventy-two hours after the detention hearing, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. Upon filing the petition, the court, if practicable, shall send notice of the pendency of such action to the juvenile's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian.

If the petition is the first juvenile petition filed against the juvenile in any jurisdiction and is initiated in a jurisdiction that has restorative justice practices available, the district attorney or the district attorney's designee may determine
whether the juvenile is suitable for restorative justice practices. The district attorney shall consider whether the victim, having been informed about restorative justice practices pursuant to section 24-4.1-303 (11)(g), is requesting
consideration of restorative justice practices as an alternative to formal prosecution; the seriousness of the crime; the crime's impact on the victim; the best methodology to involve the victim; whether the juvenile accepts responsibility
for, expresses remorse for, and is willing to repair the harm caused by the juvenile's actions; whether the juvenile's parent or legal guardian is willing to support the juvenile in the process; and other programmatic support available.
If a juvenile wants to participate in restorative justice practices, the juvenile shall make the request to the district attorney or the law enforcement agency administering the program and may not make the request to the victim.
If requested by the juvenile, restorative justice practices may only be conducted after the district attorney consults with the victim and offers the victim an opportunity to participate or submit a victim impact statement. If
a victim elects not to attend, a victim-offender conference may be held with a suitable victim surrogate or victim advocate, and the victim may submit a victim impact statement. The district attorney may offer dismissal of charges
as an option for the successful completion of these and any other conditions imposed and designed to address the harm done to the victim and the community by the offender, subject to approval by the court.

Form and content. The petition and all subsequent court documents in any proceedings brought pursuant to section 19-1-104 (1)(a) or (1)(b) must be titled "The People of the State of Colorado, in the Interest of ........, a juvenile (or juveniles) and
Concerning ........, Respondent". The petition may be filed using the language of the statutes defining the offense, including either conjunctive or disjunctive clauses. Pleading in either the conjunctive or the disjunctive places
a respondent on notice that the prosecution may rely on any or all of the alternatives alleged.

The petition must plainly set forth the facts that bring the juvenile within the court's jurisdiction. If the petition alleges that the juvenile is delinquent, it must cite the law or municipal or county ordinance that the juvenile is alleged to have
violated. The petition must also state the name, age, and residence of the juvenile and the names and residences of the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian or of the nearest known relative if a parent, guardian,
or other legal custodian is unknown.

Pursuant to section 19-1-126, in those delinquency proceedings to which the federal "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1901 et seq., as amended, applies, including but not limited to status offenses such as the illegal possession or consumption
of ethyl alcohol or marijuana by an underage person or illegal possession of marijuana paraphernalia by an underage person, as described in section 18-13-122, and possession of handguns by juveniles, as described in section
18-12-108.5, the petition must:

Include a statement indicating what continuing inquiries the district attorney or the district attorney's representative has made in determining whether the juvenile is an Indian child;

Identify whether the juvenile is an Indian child; and

Include the identity of the Indian child's tribe, if the child is identified as an Indian child.

If notices were sent to the parent or Indian custodian of the child and to the Indian child's tribe, pursuant to section 19-1-126, the postal receipts must be attached to the petition and filed with the court or filed within fourteen days after the filing
of the petition, as specified in section 19-1-126 (1)(c).

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 596, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former §§ 19-2-512 and 19-2-513 as they existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-503. Aggravated juvenile offender.

In any action in delinquency alleging that a juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), the petition must allege by separate count that the juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender and that increased commitment
is authorized.

If the petition alleges that the juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), the petition must identify by separate counts each alleged former adjudication or probation revocation and, for each such count, must
include the date of adjudication or probation revocation, the court, and the specific act that formed the basis for the adjudication or probation revocation. If the alleged prior adjudication or probation revocation occurred
outside of this state, the petition must so allege and state that the delinquent act that formed the basis for the adjudication or probation revocation would constitute a felony in this state.

In any action in delinquency in which it is alleged that a juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), the court shall, at the juvenile's first appearance, advise the juvenile of the effect and consequences of
the allegation that the juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender.

If a juvenile is alleged to be an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), the juvenile is required, at the juvenile's first appearance before the court, to admit or deny any previous adjudications or probation revocations
alleged in the petition. A refusal to admit or deny any such adjudication or probation revocation is considered a denial.

In addition to the rights specified in section 19-2.5-605, a juvenile who is alleged to be an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), may file a written request that adjudication of the act that is the subject of the petition
must be to a jury of twelve persons, and the court shall so order it. A juvenile who requests a jury is deemed to have waived the time limit for an adjudicatory trial pursuant to section 19-2.5-610 (4).

When a jury is requested pursuant to this subsection (3), the following challenges are allowed:

If the petition alleges that one juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), the state and the juvenile are each entitled to five peremptory challenges.

If the petition alleges that more than one juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), and the adjudicatory trials on the acts that are the subject of the petition are not severed, the state and the defense are
entitled to two additional challenges for every juvenile after the first, not to exceed fifteen peremptory challenges per side; when multiple juveniles are adjudicated in a single hearing, each peremptory challenge
made on the part of the juveniles must be made and considered as the joint peremptory challenge of all of the juveniles.

When more than one petition concerning different juveniles are consolidated for the adjudication of the delinquent acts that are the subjects of the petitions, peremptory challenges are allowed as if the juveniles had been joined in the same petition
in delinquency.

If a juvenile alleged to be an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), admits the previous adjudications or probation revocations alleged in the petition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, further proof of such
previous adjudications or probation revocations is not required. Upon a finding that the juvenile has committed the delinquent acts that are the subject of the petition alleging that the juvenile is an aggravated juvenile
offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), the court may enter any sentence authorized by this section.

If a juvenile alleged to be an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4), denies one or more of the previous adjudications or probation revocations alleged in the petition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the court,
after a finding of guilty of the acts that are the subject of this petition, shall conduct a separate hearing in which the court shall be the trier of fact to determine whether the juvenile has suffered such adjudications
or probation revocations. Each count alleging a previous adjudication or probation revocation must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt.

In any hearing before the court pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section, a duly authenticated copy of the record of an adjudication or probation revocation is prima facie evidence that the juvenile suffered the adjudication or probation revocation.
In addition, any basic identification information that is part of the record of the former adjudication or probation revocation at the place the juvenile was incarcerated after disposition of the adjudication or probation
revocation may be introduced into evidence in any hearing before the court pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section and is prima facie evidence of the identity of the juvenile.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 598, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-601 (1) to (4) as it existed prior to 2021.